Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.335

Washington quality award council—Organization—Duties.

(1) The Washington quality award council shall be organized as a private, nonprofit corporation, in accordance with chapter 24.03A RCW and this section.

(2) The council shall oversee the governor's Washington state quality award program. The purpose of the program is to improve the overall competitiveness of the state's economy by stimulating Washington state industries, business, and organizations to bring about measurable success through setting standards of organizational excellence, encouraging organizational self-assessment, identifying successful organizations as role models, and providing a valuable mechanism for promoting and strengthening a commitment to continuous quality improvement in all sectors of the state's economy. The governor shall annually present the award to organizations that improve the quality of their products and services and are noteworthy examples of high-performing work organizations, as determined by the council in consultation with the governor or appointed representative.

(3) The governor shall appoint a representative to serve on the board of directors of the council.

(4) The council shall establish a board of examiners, a recognition committee, and such other committees or subgroups as it deems appropriate to carry out its responsibilities.

(5) The council may conduct such public information, research, education, and assistance programs as it deems appropriate to further quality improvement in organizations operating in the state of Washington.

(6) The council shall:

(a) Approve and announce award recipients;

(b) Approve guidelines to examine applicant organizations;

(c) Approve appointment of board of examiners; and

(d) Arrange appropriate annual awards and recognition for recipients.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5219; 2004 c 245 s 1; 2000 c 216 s 1; 1998 c 245 s 86; 1997 c 329 s 1; 1994 c 306 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.07.290, 43.330.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.